Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and in KRS 186.043, 186.164, 186.166, 186.1722, and 186.174:
(a) "Special license plate" means a unique license plate issued under this chapter to a group or organization
that readily identifies the operator of the motor vehicle or motorcycle bearing the plate as a member of a
group or organization, or a supporter of the work, goals, or mission of a group or organization. The term
shall not include regular license plates issued under KRS 186.240;
(b) "Street rod" means a modernized private passenger motor vehicle manufactured prior to the year 1949,
or designed or manufactured to resemble a vehicle manufactured prior to 1949;
(c) "SF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is dedicated for
use by the Transportation Cabinet;
(d) "CF" means the county clerk's fee for issuing a motor vehicle registration as established under KRS
186.040(1). If a CF amount is charged for a license plate listed in this section, the applicant for that
plate shall also pay the fees identified in KRS 186.040(6). If a CF amount is not charged, the applicant
shall not be required to pay those fees; and
(e) "EF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is mandated by
this chapter to be dedicated for use by a particular group or organization.
(2) The initial purchase fee and renewal fee for a special license plate created under this chapter shall be as
established in this subsection and includes the name of group or organization and the total initial and renewal
fee required for the plate. The amount in parentheses indicates how the total fee is required to be divided:
(a) Disabled veterans who receive assistance to purchase a vehicle from the United States Department of
Veterans' Affairs, veterans declared by the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs to be one
hundred percent (100%) service-connected disabled, and recipients of the Congressional Medal of
Honor:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
(b) Former prisoners of war and survivors of Pearl Harbor:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(c) Members of the Kentucky National Guard and recipients of the Purple Heart:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(d) Members of the Civil Air Patrol; active, retired, veteran, reserve, or auxiliary members of the United
States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard; Merchant Marines who
served between December 7, 1941, and August 15, 1945; recipients of the Silver Star Medal, the Legion
of Merit Medal, the Distinguished Flying Cross, the Air Medal, the Combat Action Badge, the Combat
Infantry Badge, or the Bronze Star Medal; persons who wish to receive Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star
Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plates beyond the two (2) exempted from fees under KRS
186.041(6); individuals eligible for a special military service academy license plate under KRS
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
186.041(8); individuals eligible for a special military unit license plate under KRS 186.163; and
disabled veterans who have been declared to be between fifty percent (50%) and ninety-nine percent
(99%) service-connected disabled by the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(e) Recipients of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross:
1. Initial Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(f) Disabled license plates:
1. Initial Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(g) Historic vehicles:
1. Initial Fee for two plates: $56 ($50 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: Do not renew annually.
(h) Members of Congress:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(i) Firefighters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters
Association).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters
Association).
(j) Emergency management:
1. Initial Fee: $31 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(k) Fraternal Order of Police:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
(l) Law Enforcement Memorial:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
(m) Personalized plates for a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under the provisions of KRS
186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), or a motorcycle required to be registered under the provisions of KRS
186.050(2):
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

CHAPTER 31 3
(n) Street rods:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(o) Nature plates:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land
Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land
Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
(p) Amateur radio:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(q) Kentucky General Assembly:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(r) Kentucky Court of Justice:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(s) Masons:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky).
(t) Collegiate plates:
1. Initial Fee: $53 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the
university whose name will be borne on the plate).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the
university whose name will be borne on the plate).
(u) Independent Colleges:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent
Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds of the
Association's members).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent
Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds of the
Association's members).
(v) Child Victims:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims' trust fund
established under KRS 41.400).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims' trust fund
established under KRS 41.400).
(w) Kentucky Horse Council:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(x) Ducks Unlimited:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited).
(y) Spay neuter:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control and care fund
established under KRS 258.119).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control and care fund
established under KRS 258.119).
(z) Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
3. A person may receive a maximum of two (2) plates under this paragraph free of charge and may
purchase additional plates for fees as established in subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(aa) I Support Veterans:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Department of
Veterans' Affairs).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Department of
Veterans' Affairs).
(ab) Gold Star Siblings, Gold Star Sons, or Gold Star Daughters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(ac) POW/MIA Awareness:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans' program trust fund
established under KRS 40.460).
(ad) Personalized plates for a recreational vehicle that is required to be registered under the provisions of
KRS 186.050(11):
1. Initial Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(ae) Friends of Kentucky Agriculture:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the agricultural program trust
fund established under KRS 246.247).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the agricultural program trust fund
established under KRS 246.247).
(af) Special license plates established under KRS 186.164:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
(3) Any special license plate may be combined with a personalized license plate for a twenty-five dollar ($25)
state fee in addition to all other fees for the particular special license plate established in this section and in
KRS 186.164(3). The twenty-five dollar ($25) fee required under this subsection shall be divided between the
cabinet and the county clerk of the county where the applicant is applying for the license plate with the cabinet
receiving twenty dollars ($20) and the county clerk receiving five dollars ($5).

CHAPTER 31 5
(4) (a) A sponsoring organization of any special license plate issued under this section or any special license
plate established under the provisions of KRS 186.164 may petition the cabinet for the production of
that special license plate for motorcycles.
(b) The cabinet shall make all of the special military license plates in this section available for motorcycles
owned or leased by eligible individuals.
(c) Owners and lessees of motorcycles registered under KRS 186.050(2) may be eligible to receive special
license plates approved by the cabinet under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. Applicants for a
special license plate for a motorcycle shall be required to pay the fee for a special plate as prescribed in
this section or in KRS 186.164. The fee paid for the special plate for a motorcycle shall be in lieu of the
registration fee required under KRS 186.050(2).
(5) The Transportation Cabinet shall:
(a) Identify the cost of issuing a child victims' trust fund special license plate under subsection (2)(v) of this
section; and
(b) Transfer any revenue received from the initial or renewal SF fee that is in excess of the cost identified
in paragraph (a) of this subsection to the child victims' trust fund established under KRS 41.400.
Section 2. KRS 186.166 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall, unless directed otherwise by the General Assembly, perpetually produce the
following special license plates: military license plates, military unit license plates, U.S. Congressional license
plates, firefighter license plates, emergency management license plates, Fraternal Order of Police license
plates, Law Enforcement Memorial license plates, street rod license plates, nature license plates, amateur radio
license plates, Kentucky General Assembly license plates, Kentucky Court of Justice license plates, Masonic
Order license plates, collegiate license plates, independent college and university license plates, child victims'
trust fund license plates, Kentucky Horse Council license plates, Ducks Unlimited license plates, Gold Star
Mothers, Fathers, and Spouses license plates, Gold Star Siblings, Sons, and Daughters license plates, Silver
Star Medal license plates, Legion of Merit Medal license plates, Bronze Star Medal license plates, Air Medal
license plates, Distinguished Flying Cross license plates, Combat Action Badge license plates, Combat
Infantry Badge license plates, POW/MIA Awareness license plates, spay neuter license plates, service
academy license plates, Friends of Kentucky Agriculture license plates, and I Support Veterans license plates.
(2) The design of the plates identified for perpetual production under this section may be revised upon request of a
group or organization requesting a design revision under the provisions of KRS 186.164(15).
(3) (a) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall not include any representation of the word "Kentucky"
that is a registered trademark or slogan which appears on a general issue license plate.
(b) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall include a representation of the Purple Heart medal and
the words "Combat Wounded."
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version